Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2321
Board; use of funds; restriction.

No funds collected by the board shall be expended directly or indirectly to promote or oppose any candidate for public office or to influence state legislation. The board shall not expend more than twenty-five percent of its annual budget to influence federal legislation.

Laws 1981, LB 11, § 34;

Laws 1985, LB 60, § 1.